Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 1 Laying Out and Taking by Cities and Towns

24-1-1.
Authorization of condemnation.

Whenever the city council of any city or the town council of any town shall determine that the public interest and convenience makes necessary or advantageous the acquisition of land or other real property, or any interest, estate, or right therein for the establishing, laying out, widening, extending or relocating, regrading, straightening, or improving any public highway, street, parkway, or driftway, or to secure more suitable lines, grades or safety, it may proceed to acquire the same by the exercise of eminent domain in the manner prescribed in this chapter, provided that no real property or interest, estate, or right therein belonging to the state shall be acquired without its consent and no real property or interest, estate, or right therein belonging to or used by a public utility shall be acquired without the consent of the division of public utilities and carriers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 67.

24-1-2.
Filing of plat and declaration.

Within one year after its passage, the city or town council shall cause to be filed in the land evidence records a copy of its resolution declaring that the public interest and convenience makes necessary or advantageous the acquisition of real property in the manner prescribed by this chapter and also a description of the land or other real property indicating the nature and extent of the estate or interest therein taken as provided in this chapter and a plat thereof, and a copy of the resolution, description and plat shall be certified by the city or town clerk.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 97.

24-1-3.
Deposit of compensation for property taken.

Immediately after the taking of property, the city or town council shall cause to be filed in the superior court in and for the county in which the real property lies a statement of the sum of money estimated to be just compensation for the property taken, and shall deposit in the superior court to the use of the persons entitled thereto the sum set forth in the statement. The city or town council shall satisfy the court that the amount so deposited with the court is sufficient to satisfy the just claims of all persons having an estate or interest in the real property. Whenever the city or town council satisfies the court that the claims of all persons interested in the real property taken have been satisfied, the unexpended balance shall be ordered repaid immediately to the city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 97.

24-1-4.
Vesting of title to property taken.

Upon the filing of the copy of the resolution, description and plat in the land evidence records and upon the making of the deposit in accordance with the order of the superior court, title to the real property in fee simple absolute or such lesser estate or interest therein specified in the resolution shall vest in the city or town, and the real property shall be deemed to be condemned and taken for the use of the city or town, and the right to just compensation for the real property shall vest in the persons entitled thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1.

24-1-5.
Service of notice of condemnation.

After the filing of the copy of the resolution, description and plat, notice of the taking of land or other real property shall be served upon the owners of or persons having any estate or interest in the real property by the city or town sergeant or any constable of the city or town by leaving a copy of the resolution, description and plat attested by the city or town clerk with each of such persons personally, or at the last and usual place of abode in this state with some person living there, and in case any of such persons are absent from this state and have no last and usual place of abode therein occupied by any person, a copy shall be left with the person or persons, if any, in charge of, or having possession of the land or other real property taken of the absent persons, and another copy thereof shall be mailed to the address of the person, if the address is known to the officer serving the notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1.

24-1-6.
Publication of notice.

After the filing of a resolution, description and plat, the city or town council shall cause a copy of the resolution to be published in some newspaper having general circulation in the city or town at least once a week for three (3) successive weeks. The newspaper notice containing the full resolution, description, and plat shall be inserted once in its entirety and thereafter a weekly formal legal notice shall be inserted stating that there was a taking by the city or town with a brief description of the real property and a reference to the original advertisement which contained the full resolution, description, and plat.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 117, § 1.

24-1-7.
Payment of agreed price.

If any party shall agree with the city or town council upon the price to be paid for the value of the land or other real property so taken and of appurtenant damage to any remainder or for the value of the party’s estate, right or interest therein, the court, upon application of the parties in interest, may order that the sum agreed upon be paid forthwith from the money deposited, as the just compensation to be awarded in the proceedings; provided, however, that no payment shall be made to any official or employee of the city or town for any property or interest therein acquired from an official or employee unless the amount of the payment is determined by the court to constitute just compensation to be awarded in the proceedings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1.

24-1-8.
Assessment of damages by court.

Any owner of, or person entitled to any estate or right in, or interested in any part of the real property so taken, who cannot agree with the city or town council upon the price to be paid for his or her estate, right or interest in such real property so taken and the appurtenant damage to the remainder, may, within one year from the time the sum of money estimated to be just compensation is deposited in the superior court to the use of the persons entitled thereto, apply by petition to the superior court for the county in which the real property is situated, setting forth the taking of his or her land or estate or interest therein and praying for an assessment of damages by the court or by a jury. Upon the filing of a petition the court shall cause twenty (20) days’ notice of the pendency thereof to be given to the city or town by serving the city or town clerk with a certified copy of the petition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1.

Parties.

Even if a court was in error in admitting certain parties as petitioners, where the error was not prejudicial, reversal was not required. J.W.A. Realty, Inc. v. Cranston,

121 R.I. 374

, 399 A.2d 479,

1979 R.I. LEXIS 1788

(1979).

24-1-9.
Conduct of trial on damages.

After the service of a notice of condemnation the court may proceed to a trial. The trial shall be conducted as other civil actions at law are tried. The trial shall determine all questions of fact relating to the value of the real property, and any estate or interest therein, and the amount thereof, and the appurtenant damage to any remainder and the amount thereof, and the trial and decision or verdict of the jury shall be subject to all rights to except to rulings, to move for new trial, and to appeal, as are provided by law. Upon the entry of judgment in the proceedings, execution shall be issued against the money deposited in court and in default thereof against any other property of the city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1.

24-1-10.
Consolidation of petitions.

In case two (2) or more petitioners make claim to the same real property, or to any estate or interest therein, or to different estates or interests in the same real property, the court shall, upon motion, consolidate their several petitions for trial at the same time, and may frame all necessary issues for the trial thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1.

24-1-11.
Representation of infants and incompetents.

If any real property or any estate or interest therein, in which any infant or other person not capable in law to act in his or her own behalf is interested, is taken under the provisions of this chapter, the superior court, upon the filing therein of a petition by or in behalf of the infant or person or by the city or town council, may appoint a guardian ad litem for the infant or other person. Guardians may, with the advice and consent of the superior court, and upon such terms as the superior court may prescribe, release to the city or town all claims for damages for the land of the infant or other person or for any estate or interest therein. Any lawfully appointed, qualified and acting guardian or other fiduciary of the estate of the infant or other person, with the approval of the court of probate within this state having jurisdiction to authorize the sale of lands and properties within this state of the infant or other person, may before the filing of a petition, agree with the city or town council upon the amount of damages suffered by the infant or other person for any taking of his or her real property or of his or her interest or estate therein, and may, upon receiving such amount, release to the city or town all claims for damages for the infant or other person for the taking.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1.

24-1-12.
Late filing of petition.

In case any owner of or any person having an estate or interest in real property shall fail to file his or her petition as provided in §

24-1-8

, the superior court for the county in which the real property is situated, in its discretion, may permit the filing of the petition within one year subsequent to the year following the time of the deposit in the superior court of the sum of money estimated to be just compensation for the property taken; provided, the person shall have had no actual knowledge of the taking of the land in season to file the petition; and provided, no other person or persons claiming to own the real property or estate or interest therein shall have been paid the value thereof; and provided, no judgment has been rendered against the city or town for the payment of the value to any other person or persons claiming to own the real estate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 52.

24-1-13.
Unknown owners.

If any real property or any estate or interest therein is unclaimed or held by a person or persons whose whereabouts are unknown, after making inquiry satisfactory to the superior court for the county in which the real property lies, the city or town council, after the expiration of two (2) years from the first publication of the copy of the resolution and description and plat, may petition the court that the value of the estate or interest of the unknown person or persons be determined. After such notice by publication to the person or persons as the court in its discretion may order, and after a hearing on the petition, the court shall fix the value of the estate or interest and shall order a sum to be deposited in the registry of the court in a special account to accumulate for the benefit of the person or persons, if any, entitled thereto. The receipt of the clerk of the superior court therefor shall constitute a discharge of the city or town from all liability in connection with the taking. When the person entitled to the money deposited shall have satisfied the superior court of his or her right to receive the same, the court shall cause it to be paid over to the person, with all accumulations thereon.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1.

24-1-14.
Orders as to charges on lands.

The superior court shall have power to make such orders with respect to encumbrances, liens, taxes, and other charges on the land, if any, as shall be just and equitable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1.

24-1-15.
Exchange of property.

Whenever in the opinion of the city or town council a substantial saving in the cost of acquiring title can be effected by conveying other real property, title to which is in the city or town, to the person or persons from whom the estate or interest in real property is being purchased or taken, or by the construction or improvement by the city or town of any work or facility upon the remaining real property of the person or persons from whom the estate or interest in real property is being purchased or taken, the city or town council shall be and hereby is authorized to convey such other real property of the city or town to the person or persons from whom the estate or interest in real property is being purchased or taken and to construct or improve any work or facility upon the remaining land of the person or persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 216, § 1.